Hawaii statutes.
§514A-1.5
Applicability of chapter. (a)
This chapter:

(1) Shall not apply to condominiums created on or
after July 1, 2006, or that are registered with the commission pursuant to part
IV of chapter 514B; and

(2) On and after July 1, 2006, shall apply only to:

(A) Condominiums created prior to July 1,
2006, except as provided in subsection (b) and sections 514B-22 and 514B-23;
and

(B) A developer's sale of condominiums in a
project for which a notice of intention was filed with the commission prior to
July 1, 2006, pursuant to section 514A-31, except where the developer elects to
register an existing project with the commission under part IV of chapter 514B,
pursuant to section 9(b) of Act 93, Session Laws of Hawaii 2005.

(b) This chapter shall not apply to any
condominium project or association of apartment owners created prior to May 29,
1963, pursuant to Act 180, Session Laws of Hawaii 1961, unless all of the
owners and holders of liens affecting any of the apartments in the project have
expressly declared that this chapter shall apply to the property, and shall
govern the rights, interests, and remedies of all persons owning interests in
or liens upon the property; provided that any condominium project or
association of apartment owners created prior to May 29, 1963, pursuant to Act
180, Session Laws of Hawaii 1961, having seven or more apartments shall
register with the commission and comply with the requirements pursuant to
sections 514A-95.1 and 514A-132, except for the fidelity bond requirement. The
express declaration shall be made through the execution and recordation of a
declaration in form and content required to establish a condominium property
regime pursuant to this chapter. [L 2007, c 244, pt of §2]

Note

Section 514A-132 referred to in text is repealed.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next